lt-LT: Konsolės uždangalo montavimo metodas: Lipnus pagrindas; Sagtys / dirželiai; Užspaudžiamas; Sutraukiamas; Elastingas kraštas; Elastingi dirželiai; Lipukiniai (Velcro) dirželiai; Tvirtinamas varžtais / detalėmis; Užmaunamas; Užtrauktukas; Kita
pt-BR: Método de instalação da tampa do console: Fixação adesiva; Fivelas/tiras; De encaixe; Cordão; Borda elástica; Tiras elásticas; Tiras de fixação aderente (Velcro); Montagem com parafusos/ferragens; De vestir; Zíper; Outro
nb: Monteringsmetode for konsolldeksel: Selvklebende bakside; Spenner/stropper; Klips; Snøring; Elastisk kant; Elastiske stropper; Borrelåsstropper; Skrue-/maskinvaremontert; Trekkes på; Glidelås; Annet
sl-SI: Način namestitve prevleke konzole: Lepilna podlaga; Zaponke/trakovi; Zataknljivo; Vrvica; Elastični rob; Elastični trakovi; Trakovi na ježka (Velcro); Pritrjeno z vijaki/okovjem; Natakljivo; Zadrga; Drugo
sk-SK: Spôsob inštalácie krytu konzoly: Lepiaca zadná strana; Spony/popruhy; Pripínacie; Sťahovacia šnúrka; Elastický okraj; Elastické popruhy; Popruhy so suchým zipsom; Montáž pomocou skrutiek/kovania; Násuvné; Zips; Iné
tr: Konsol kapağı montaj yöntemi: Yapışkanlı arka yüzey; Tokalar/askılar; Klipsli; Büzgülü; Elastik kenar; Elastik askılar; Cırt cırtlı (Velcro) askılar; Vida/donanım montajlı; Geçmeli; Fermuar; Diğer
pl: Metoda montażu osłony konsoli: Podkład samoprzylepny; Klamry/paski; Na zatrzask; Sznurek ściągający; Elastyczna krawędź; Elastyczne paski; Paski na rzep (Velcro); Montaż na śruby/okucia; Wsuwane; Zamek błyskawiczny; Inna
vi: Phương pháp lắp đặt tấm che bảng điều khiển: Mặt sau có keo dính; Khóa gài/dây đeo; Dạng kẹp; Dây rút; Mép viền co giãn; Dây co giãn; Dây quai dán (Velcro); Gắn bằng ốc vít/phần cứng; Dạng bọc; Khóa kéo; Khác
pt-PT: Método de instalação da tampa da consola: Fita adesiva; Fivelas/correias; De mola; Cordão; Borda elástica; Correias elásticas; Correias de gancho e laço (Velcro); Montagem com parafusos/ferragens; De enfiar; Fecho de correr; Outro
cs: Způsob instalace krytu konzoly: Lepicí podklad; Přezky/popruhy; Nacvakávací; Stahovací šňůrka; Elastický okraj; Elastické popruhy; Pásky se suchým zipem (Velcro); Montáž pomocí šroubů/kování; Navlékací; Zip; Jiné
es: Método de instalación de la cubierta de la consola: Reverso adhesivo; Hebillas/correas; Con clip; Cordón ajustable; Borde elástico; Correas elásticas; Correas de gancho y bucle (velcro); Montaje con tornillos/herrajes; Deslizable; Cremallera; Otro
zh-CN: 控制台盖安装方法: 粘性背衬; 扣环/绑带; 夹扣式; 抽绳; 弹性边缘; 弹性绑带; 魔术贴绑带; 螺钉/五金件安装; 套入式; 拉链; 其他
el: Μέθοδος εγκατάστασης καλύμματος κονσόλας: Αυτοκόλλητη πίσω πλευρά; Αγκράφες/ιμάντες; Με κλιπ; Με κορδόνι; Ελαστικό άκρο; Ελαστικοί ιμάντες; Ιμάντες hook & loop (τύπου Velcro); Τοποθέτηση με βίδες/εξαρτήματα; Εφαρμογή slip-on; Φερμουάρ; Άλλο
hr-HR: Način ugradnje poklopca konzole: Ljepljiva poleđina; Kopče/remeni; Na kopču; Na vezicu; Elastični rub; Elastične trake; Trake na čičak; Pričvršćivanje vijcima / okovima; Navlačenje; Patentni zatvarač; Ostalo
sv: Installationsmetod för konsolskydd: Självhäftande baksida; Spännen/remmar; Clip-on; Dragsko; Elastisk kant; Elastiska remmar; Kardborreband; Skruv/beslagsmonterad; Träs på; Dragkedja; Annan
fr: Méthode d’installation du cache de console: Dos adhésif; Boucles/sangles; À clipser; Cordon de serrage; Bord élastique; Sangles élastiques; Sangles auto-agrippantes (Velcro); Fixation par vis/quincaillerie; À enfiler; Fermeture éclair; Autre
ko: 콘솔 커버 설치 방식: 접착식 뒷면; 버클/스트랩; 클립온; 조임끈; 탄성 마감; 탄성 스트랩; 훅 앤 루프(벨크로) 스트랩; 나사/하드웨어 장착; 슬립온; 지퍼; 기타
th: วิธีการติดตั้งฝาครอบคอนโซล: ด้านหลังแบบมีกาว; ตัวล็อก/สายรัด; แบบหนีบ; เชือกรูด; ขอบยางยืด; สายรัดยางยืด; แถบตีนตุ๊กแก (Velcro); ยึดด้วยสกรู/ฮาร์ดแวร์; แบบสวม; ซิป; อื่นๆ
fi: Konsolin kannen asennusmenetelmä: Liimatausta; Soljet/hihnat; Klipsikiinnitys; Kiristysnyöri; Joustava reuna; Joustavat hihnat; Tarranauhat; Ruuvikiinnitys/helakiinnitys; Pujotettava; Vetoketju; Muu
nl: Mntagemethode voor consolehoes: Klevende achterkant; Gespen/banden; Clip-on; Trekkoord; Elastische rand; Elastische banden; Klittenbandsluitingen; Gemonteerd met schroeven/hardware; Slip-on; Rits; Overig
de: Installationsmethode der Konsolenabdeckung: Klebende Rückseite; Schnallen/Gurte; Clip-on; Kordelzug; Elastischer Rand; Elastische Gurte; Klettverschlüsse; Mit Schrauben/Beschlägen befestigt; Zum Überziehen; Reißverschluss; Sonstige
it: Metodo di installazione del coperchio della console: Retro adesivo; Fibbie/cinghie; A clip; Coulisse; Bordo elastico; Cinghie elastiche; Cinghie a strappo (Velcro); Fissaggio con viti/minuteria; Da infilare; Cerniera; Altro
ja: コンソールカバーの取り付け方法: 粘着シート; バックル / ストラップ; クリップオン; 巾着; ゴム縁; 伸縮性ストラップ; 面ファスナー (ベルクロ) ストラップ; ネジ / 金具固定; スリップオン; ジッパー; その他
da: Installationsmetode for konsolcover: Selvklæbende bagside; Spænder/stropper; Clip-on; Snoretræk; Elastisk kant; Elastiske stropper; Burrebåndsremme (Velcro); Skrue-/beslagmonteret; Slip-on; Lynlås; Anden
en: Console cover installation method: Adhesive backing; Buckles/straps; Clip-on; Drawstring; Elastic edge; Elastic straps; Hook & loop (Velcro) straps; Screw/hardware-mounted; Slip-on; Zipper; Other
zh-TW: 中控台保護套安裝方式: 自黏背膠; 扣環/綁帶; 夾扣式; 抽繩; 彈性邊緣; 彈性綁帶; 魔鬼氈綁帶; 螺絲/五金件安裝; 套入式; 拉鍊; 其他
hu: Konzolburkolat szerelési módja: Öntapadós hátlap; Csatok/pántok; Rápattintható; Húzózsinóros; Gumírozott szél; Gumipántok; Tépőzáras pántok; Csavarral/rögzítőelemekkel szerelt; Rácsúsztatható; Cipzáras; Egyéb
bg-BG: Метод за монтаж на конзолния капак: Залепващ гръб; Катарми/каишки; С щипки; Връзки; Ластичен ръб; Ластични каишки; Каишки с велкро; Монтаж с винтове/хардуер; Нахлузване; Цип; Друг
ru: Способ установки чехла консоли: Клеевая основа; Пряжки / ремни; На клипсах; На шнурке; Эластичный край; Эластичные ремни; Ремни на липучках (Velcro); На винтах / крепежах; Натягивающийся; На молнии; Другое
ro-RO: Metoda de instalare a capacului consolei: Suport adeziv; Catarame/curele; Cu clips; Șnur; Margine elastică; Curele elastice; Curele cu scai (Velcro); Fixare cu șuruburi/feronerie; De tip manșon; Fermoar; Altele